Yamls/N-tuj_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  
  Noun - туй: # Ordinary nouns - full paradigm 'road / tie / дорога'
     туй+N+Sg+Nom: туй
     туй+N+Sg+Acc: туй
     туй+N+Sg+Gen: туйлӧн
     туй+N+Sg+Abl: туйлісь
     туй+N+Sg+Dat: туйлӧ
     туй+N+Sg+Ins: туйӧн
     туй+N+Sg+Com: туйкӧт
     туй+N+Sg+Car: туйтӧг
     туй+N+Sg+Cns: туйла
     туй+N+Sg+Cmpr: туйся
     туй+N+Sg+Ine: туйын
     туй+N+Sg+Ela: туйісь
     туй+N+Sg+Ill: туйӧ
     туй+N+Sg+Apr: туйлань
     туй+N+Sg+Egr: туйсянь
     туй+N+Sg+Prl: туйӧт
     туй+N+Sg+Ter: [туйӧдз, туйви]
     туй+N+Sg+AprIne: туйланьын
     туй+N+Sg+AprEla: туйланись
     туй+N+Sg+AprIll: туйланьӧ
     туй+N+Sg+AprEgr: туйланьсянь
     туй+N+Sg+AprTer: туйланьӧдз
     туй+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg1: туйӧ
     туй+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg1: туйӧлӧн
     туй+N+Sg+Abl+PxSg1: туйӧлісь
     туй+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg1: туйӧлӧ
     туй+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg1: туйӧс
     туй+N+Sg+Ins+PxSg1: туйнам
     туй+N+Sg+Com+PxSg1: туйӧкӧт
     туй+N+Sg+Car+PxSg1: туйӧтӧг
     туй+N+Sg+Cns+PxSg1: туйӧла
     туй+N+Sg+Cmpr+PxSg1: туйӧся
     туй+N+Sg+Ine+PxSg1: туям
     туй+N+Sg+Ela+PxSg1: туйсим
     туй+N+Sg+Ill+PxSg1: туям
     туй+N+Sg+Apr+PxSg1: [туйӧлань, туйланям]
     туй+N+Sg+Egr+PxSg1: туйӧсянь
     туй+N+Sg+Prl+PxSg1: [туйӧттям, туйӧттим]
     туй+N+Sg+Ter+PxSg1: [туйӧдззам, туйӧдззим]
     туй+N+Sg+AprIne+PxSg1: туйланям
     туй+N+Sg+AprEla+PxSg1: туйланьсим
     туй+N+Sg+AprIll+PxSg1: туйланям
     туй+N+Sg+AprEgr+PxSg1: [туйланьсям, туйӧланьсянь]
     туй+N+Sg+AprTer+PxSg1: [туйланьӧдззам, туйланьӧдззим]
     туй+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg2: туйыт
     туй+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg2: туйытлӧн
     туй+N+Sg+Abl+PxSg2: туйытлісь
     туй+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg2: туйытлӧ
     туй+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg2: туйтӧ
     туй+N+Sg+Ins+PxSg2: туйнат
     туй+N+Sg+Com+PxSg2: туйыткӧт
     туй+N+Sg+Car+PxSg2: туйыттӧг
     туй+N+Sg+Cns+PxSg2: туйытла
     туй+N+Sg+Cmpr+PxSg2: туйытся
     туй+N+Sg+Ine+PxSg2: туят
     туй+N+Sg+Ela+PxSg2: туйсит
     туй+N+Sg+Ill+PxSg2: туят
     туй+N+Sg+Apr+PxSg2: [туйытлань, туйланят]
     туй+N+Sg+Egr+PxSg2: туйсянят
     туй+N+Sg+Prl+PxSg2: [туйӧттят, туйӧттит]
     туй+N+Sg+Ter+PxSg2: [туйӧдззат, туйӧдззит]
     туй+N+Sg+AprIne+PxSg2: туйланят
     туй+N+Sg+AprEla+PxSg2: туйланьсят
     туй+N+Sg+AprIll+PxSg2: туйланят
     туй+N+Sg+AprEgr+PxSg2: туйланьсянят
     туй+N+Sg+AprTer+PxSg2: [туйланьӧдззат, туйланьӧдззит]
     туй+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg3: туйыс
     туй+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg3: туйыслӧн
     туй+N+Sg+Abl+PxSg3: туйыслісь
     туй+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg3: туйыслӧ
     туй+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg3: туйсӧ
     туй+N+Sg+Ins+PxSg3: туйнас
     туй+N+Sg+Com+PxSg3: туйыскӧт
     туй+N+Sg+Car+PxSg3: туйыстӧг
     туй+N+Sg+Cns+PxSg3: туйысла
     туй+N+Sg+Cmpr+PxSg3: туйысся
     
     туй+N+Sg+Ine+PxSg3: туяс
     туй+N+Sg+Ela+PxSg3: туйсис
     туй+N+Sg+Ill+PxSg3: туяс
     туй+N+Sg+Apr+PxSg3: [туйыслань, туйланяс]
     туй+N+Sg+Egr+PxSg3: туйсяняс
     туй+N+Sg+Ter+PxSg3: [туйӧдззас, туйӧдззис]
     туй+N+Sg+AprIne+PxSg3: туйланяс
     туй+N+Sg+AprEla+PxSg3: туйланьсис
     туй+N+Sg+AprIll+PxSg3: туйланяс
     туй+N+Sg+AprEgr+PxSg3: туйланьсяняс
     туй+N+Sg+AprTer+PxSg3: [туйланьӧдззаc, туйланьӧдззиc]
     туй+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl1: туйным
     туй+N+Sg+Gen+PxPl1: туйнымлӧн
     туй+N+Sg+Abl+PxPl1: туйнымлісь
     туй+N+Sg+Dat+PxPl1: туйнымлӧ
     туй+N+Sg+Acc+PxPl1: туйнымӧс
     туй+N+Sg+Ins+PxPl1: туйнаным
     туй+N+Sg+Com+PxPl1: туйнымкӧт
     туй+N+Sg+Car+PxPl1: туйнымтӧг
     туй+N+Sg+PxPl1+Cns: туйнымла
     туй+N+Sg+Cmpr+PxPl1: туйнымся
     туй+N+Sg+Ine+PxPl1: туяным
     туй+N+Sg+Ela+PxPl1: туйсиным
     туй+N+Sg+Ill+PxPl1: туяным
     туй+N+Sg+Apr+PxPl1: [туйнымлань, туйланяным]
     туй+N+Sg+Egr+PxPl1: туйнымсянь
     туй+N+Sg+Ter+PxPl1: [туйӧдззаным, туйӧдззиным]
     туй+N+Sg+AprIne+PxPl1: туйнымлань
     туй+N+Sg+AprEla+PxPl1: туйланьсиным
     туй+N+Sg+AprIll+PxPl1: туйнымлань
     туй+N+Sg+AprEgr+PxPl1: туйланьсяньным
     туй+N+Sg+AprTer+PxPl1: [туйланьӧдззаным, туйланьӧдззиным]
     туй+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl2: туйныт
     туй+N+Sg+Gen+PxPl2: туйнытлӧн
     туй+N+Sg+Abl+PxPl2: туйнытлісь
     туй+N+Sg+Dat+PxPl2: туйнытлӧ
     туй+N+Sg+Acc+PxPl2: туйнытӧ
     туй+N+Sg+Ins+PxPl2: туйнаныт
     туй+N+Sg+Com+PxPl2: туйныткӧт
     туй+N+Sg+Car+PxPl2: туйныттӧг
     туй+N+Sg+Cns+PxPl2: туйнытла
     туй+N+Sg+Cmpr+PxPl2: туйсянят
     туй+N+Sg+Ine+PxPl2: туяныт
     туй+N+Sg+Ela+PxPl2: туйсиныт
     туй+N+Sg+Ill+PxPl2: туяныт
     туй+N+Sg+Apr+PxPl2: [туйнытлань, туйланяныт]
     туй+N+Sg+Egr+PxPl2: туйсяньныт
     туй+N+Sg+Ter+PxPl2: [туйӧдззаныт, туйӧдззиныт]
     туй+N+Sg+AprIne+PxPl2: туйланяныт
     туй+N+Sg+AprEla+PxPl2: туйланьсиныт
     туй+N+Sg+AprIll+PxPl2: туйланяныт
     туй+N+Sg+AprEgr+PxPl2: туйланьсяньныт
     туй+N+Sg+AprTer+PxPl2: [туйланьӧдззаныт, туйланьӧдззиныт]
     туй+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl3: туйныс
     туй+N+Sg+Gen+PxPl3: туйныслӧн
     туй+N+Sg+Abl+PxPl3: туйныслісь
     туй+N+Sg+Dat+PxPl3: туйныслӧ
     туй+N+Sg+Acc+PxPl3: туйнысӧ
     туй+N+Sg+Ins+PxPl3: туйнаныс
     туй+N+Sg+Com+PxPl3: туйныскӧт
     туй+N+Sg+Car+PxPl3: туйныстӧг
     туй+N+Sg+Cns+PxPl3: туйнысла
     туй+N+Sg+Cmpr+PxPl3: туйнысся
     туй+N+Sg+Ine+PxPl3: туяныс
     туй+N+Sg+Ela+PxPl3: туйсиныс
     туй+N+Sg+Ill+PxPl3: туяныс
     туй+N+Sg+Apr+PxPl3: [туйныслань, туйланяныс]
     туй+N+Sg+Egr+PxPl3: туйсяньныс
     туй+N+Sg+Ter+PxPl3: [туйӧдззаныс, туйӧдззиныс]
     туй+N+Sg+AprIne+PxPl3: туйланяныс
     туй+N+Sg+AprEla+PxPl3: туйланьсиныс
     туй+N+Sg+AprIll+PxPl3: туйланяныс
     туй+N+Sg+AprEgr+PxPl3: туйланьсяняныс
     туй+N+Sg+AprTer+PxPl3: [туйланьӧдззаныс, туйланьӧдззиныс]
     туй+N+Pl+Nom: туйез
     туй+N+Pl+Acc: туйез
     туй+N+Pl+Gen: туйезлӧн
     туй+N+Pl+Abl: туйезлісь
     туй+N+Pl+Dat: туйезлӧ
     туй+N+Pl+Ins: туйезӧн
     туй+N+Pl+Com: туйезкӧт
     туй+N+Pl+Car: туйезтӧг
     туй+N+Pl+Cns: туйезла
     туй+N+Pl+Cmpr: туйезся
     туй+N+Pl+Ine: туйезын
     туй+N+Pl+Ela: туйезісь
     туй+N+Pl+Ill: туйезӧ
     туй+N+Pl+Apr: туйезлань
     туй+N+Pl+Egr: туйезсянь
     туй+N+Pl+Prl: туйезӧд
     туй+N+Pl+Tra: туйезті
     туй+N+Pl+Ter: туйезӧдз
     туй+N+Pl+AprIne: туйезланьын
     туй+N+Pl+AprEla: туйезланись
     туй+N+Pl+AprIll: туйезланьӧ
     туй+N+Pl+AprEgr: туйезланьсянь
     туй+N+Pl+AprPrl: туйезланьӧт
     туй+N+Pl+AprTer: туйезланьӧдз
     туй+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg1: туйезӧ
     туй+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg1: туйезӧлӧн
     туй+N+Pl+Abl+PxSg1: туйезӧлісь
     туй+N+Pl+Dat+PxSg1: туйезӧлӧ
     туй+N+Pl+Acc+PxSg1: туйезӧс
     туй+N+Pl+Ins+PxSg1: туйезнам
     туй+N+Pl+Com+PxSg1: туйезӧкӧт
     туй+N+Pl+Car+PxSg1: туйезӧтӧг
     туй+N+Pl+Cns+PxSg1: туйезӧла
     туй+N+Pl+Cmpr+PxSg1: туйезӧся
     туй+N+Pl+Ine+PxSg1: туйезам
     туй+N+Pl+Ela+PxSg1: туйезсим
     туй+N+Pl+Ill+PxSg1: туйезам
     туй+N+Pl+Apr+PxSg1: туйезӧлань
     туй+N+Pl+Egr+PxSg1: туйезӧсянь
     туй+N+Pl+Ter+PxSg1: [туйезӧдззам, туйезӧдззим]
     туй+N+Pl+AprIne+PxSg1: туйезланям
     туй+N+Pl+AprEla+PxSg1: туйезланьсим
     туй+N+Pl+AprIll+PxSg1: туйезланям
     туй+N+Pl+AprEgr+PxSg1: туйезӧланьсянь
     туй+N+Pl+AprTer+PxSg1: [туйезланьӧдззам, туйезланьӧдззим]
     туй+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg2: [туйезыт, туйет]
     туй+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg2: [туйезытлӧн, туйетлӧн]
     туй+N+Pl+Abl+PxSg2: [туйезытлісь, туйетлісь]
     туй+N+Pl+Dat+PxSg2: [туйезытлӧ, туйетлӧ]
     туй+N+Pl+Acc+PxSg2: [туйезтӧ, туйетӧ]
     туй+N+Pl+Ins+PxSg2: туйезнат
     туй+N+Pl+Com+PxSg2: [туйезыткӧт, туйеткӧт]
     туй+N+Pl+Car+PxSg2: туйезыттӧг
     туй+N+Pl+Cns+PxSg2: [туйезытла, туйетла]
     туй+N+Pl+Cmpr+PxSg2: туйезытся
     туй+N+Pl+Ine+PxSg2: туйезат
     туй+N+Pl+Ela+PxSg2: туйезсит
     туй+N+Pl+Ill+PxSg2: туйезат
     туй+N+Pl+Apr+PxSg2: туйезланят
     туй+N+Pl+Egr+PxSg2: туйезсянят
     туй+N+Pl+Prl+PxSg2: [туйезӧттят, туйезӧттит]
     туй+N+Pl+Ter+PxSg2: [туйезӧдззат, туйезӧдззит]
     туй+N+Pl+AprIne+PxSg2: туйезланят
     туй+N+Pl+AprEla+PxSg2: туйезланьсит
     туй+N+Pl+AprIll+PxSg2: туйезланят
     туй+N+Pl+AprEgr+PxSg2: туйезланьсянят
     туй+N+Pl+AprTer+PxSg2: [туйезланьӧдззат, туйезланьӧдззит]
     туй+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg3: [туйезыс, туйес]
     туй+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg3: [туйезыслӧн, туйеслӧн]
     туй+N+Pl+Abl+PxSg3: [туйезыслісь, туйеслісь]
     туй+N+Pl+Dat+PxSg3: [туйезыслӧ, туйеслӧ]
     туй+N+Pl+Acc+PxSg3: туйезсӧ
     туй+N+Pl+Ins+PxSg3: туйезнас
     туй+N+Pl+Com+PxSg3: [туйезыскӧт, туйескӧт]
     туй+N+Pl+Car+PxSg3: [туйезыстӧг, туйестӧг]
     туй+N+Pl+Cns+PxSg3: [туйезысла, туйесла]
     туй+N+Pl+Cmpr+PxSg3: [туйезысся, туйесся]
     туй+N+Pl+Ine+PxSg3: туйезас
     туй+N+Pl+Ela+PxSg3: туйезсис
     туй+N+Pl+Ill+PxSg3: туйезас
     туй+N+Pl+Apr+PxSg3: туйезланяс
     туй+N+Pl+Egr+PxSg3: туйезсяняс
     туй+N+Pl+Ter+PxSg3: [туйезӧдззас, туйезӧдззис]
     туй+N+Pl+AprIne+PxSg3: туйезланяс
     туй+N+Pl+AprEla+PxSg3: туйезланьсис
     туй+N+Pl+AprIll+PxSg3: туйезланяс
     туй+N+Pl+AprEgr+PxSg3: туйезланьсяняс
     туй+N+Pl+AprTer+PxSg3: [туйезланьӧдззаc, туйезланьӧдззиc]
     туй+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl1: туйезным
     туй+N+Pl+Gen+PxPl1: туйезнымлӧн
     туй+N+Pl+Abl+PxPl1: туйезнымлісь
     туй+N+Pl+Dat+PxPl1: туйезнымлӧ
     туй+N+Pl+Acc+PxPl1: туйезнымӧс
     туй+N+Pl+Ins+PxPl1: туйезнаным
     туй+N+Pl+Com+PxPl1: туйезнымкӧт
     туй+N+Pl+Car+PxPl1: туйезнымтӧг
     туй+N+Pl+Cns+PxPl1: туйезнымла
     туй+N+Pl+Cmpr+PxPl1: туйезнымся
     туй+N+Pl+Ine+PxPl1: туйезаным
     туй+N+Pl+Ela+PxPl1: туйезсиным
     туй+N+Pl+Ill+PxPl1: туйезаным
     туй+N+Pl+Apr+PxPl1: туйезнымлань
     туй+N+Pl+Egr+PxPl1: туйезсяняным
     туй+N+Pl+Ter+PxPl1: [туйезӧдззаным, туйезӧдззиным]
     туй+N+Pl+AprIne+PxPl1: туйезланяным
     туй+N+Pl+AprEla+PxPl1: туйезланьсиным
     туй+N+Pl+AprIll+PxPl1: туйезланяным
     туй+N+Pl+AprEgr+PxPl1: туйезланьсяняным
     туй+N+Pl+AprTer+PxPl1: [туйезланьӧдззаным, туйезланьӧдззиным]
     туй+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl2: туйезныт
     туй+N+Pl+Gen+PxPl2: туйезнытлӧн
     туй+N+Pl+Abl+PxPl2: туйезнытлісь
     туй+N+Pl+Dat+PxPl2: туйезнытлӧ
     туй+N+Pl+Acc+PxPl2: туйезнытӧ
     туй+N+Pl+Ins+PxPl2: туйезнаныт
     туй+N+Pl+Com+PxPl2: туйезныткӧт
     туй+N+Pl+Car+PxPl2: туйезныттӧг
     туй+N+Pl+Cns+PxPl2: туйезнытла
     туй+N+Pl+Cmpr+PxPl2: туйезнытся
     туй+N+Pl+Ine+PxPl2: туйезаныт
     туй+N+Pl+Ela+PxPl2: туйезсиныт
     туй+N+Pl+Ill+PxPl2: туйезаныт
     туй+N+Pl+Apr+PxPl2: туйезнытлань
     туй+N+Pl+Egr+PxPl2: туйезсяняныт
     туй+N+Pl+Ter+PxPl2: [туйезӧдззаныт, туйезӧдззиныт]
     туй+N+Pl+AprIne+PxPl2: туйезланяныт
     туй+N+Pl+AprEla+PxPl2: туйезланьсиныт
     туй+N+Pl+AprIll+PxPl2: туйезланяныт
     туй+N+Pl+AprEgr+PxPl2: туйезланьсяняныт
     туй+N+Pl+AprTer+PxPl2: [туйезланьӧдззаныт, туйезланьӧдззаныт]
     туй+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl3: туйезныс
     туй+N+Pl+Gen+PxPl3: туйезныслӧн
     туй+N+Pl+Abl+PxPl3: туйезныслісь
     туй+N+Pl+Dat+PxPl3: туйезныслӧ
     туй+N+Pl+Acc+PxPl3: туйезнысӧ
     туй+N+Pl+Ins+PxPl3: туйезнаныс
     туй+N+Pl+Com+PxPl3: туйезныскӧт
     туй+N+Pl+Car+PxPl3: туйезныстӧг
     туй+N+Pl+Cns+PxPl3: туйезнысла
     туй+N+Pl+Cmpr+PxPl3: туйезнысся
     туй+N+Pl+Ine+PxPl3: туйезаныс
     туй+N+Pl+Ela+PxPl3: туйезсиныс
     туй+N+Pl+Ill+PxPl3: туйезаныс
     туй+N+Pl+Apr+PxPl3: [туйезныслань, туйезланяныс]
     туй+N+Pl+Egr+PxPl3: туйезсяняныс
     туй+N+Pl+Ter+PxPl3: [туйезӧдззаныс, туйезӧдззиныс]
     туй+N+Pl+AprIne+PxPl3: туйезланяныс
     туй+N+Pl+AprEla+PxPl3: туйезланьсиныс
     туй+N+Pl+AprIll+PxPl3: туйезланяныс
     туй+N+Pl+AprEgr+PxPl3: туйезланьсяняныс
     туй+N+Pl+AprTer+PxPl3: [туйезланьӧдззаныс, туйезланьӧдззиныс]
